District of Columbia statutes.
31-1205

Appeal from assessment.

Any insurer or health maintenance organization aggrieved by an assessment may appeal under procedures established in § 101 of Title 26 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (26 DCMR 101 ), or as otherwise may be provided by the Mayor. If an appellant fails to pay the assessment when due, the appellant shall be liable for any amounts correctly assessed and any penalties and interest due thereon. The appellant shall pay any amounts owed within 10 days of a final decision and the Mayor may take whatever action is appropriate under this chapter, including action under § 31-1204, or any other laws regulating the insurance industry to effect collection. In addition, the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund Bureau may appeal to the Mayor the entire annual assessment or a specific expenditure or category of expenditure, in accordance with the procedures established in 26 DCMR 101 , if it believes the assessment is not in accordance with this chapter or applicable laws.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 6, 40 DCR 6009
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 24(i), 44 DCR 818
1981 Ed., § 35-2705.